Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Feeding Stuffs

250.240.
Commercial feeding stuffs. [Repealed.]

250.250.
Sales in violation of KRS 250.240 to 250.350, and adulteration prohibited. [Repealed.]

250.260.
Containers to be labeled; size of containers. [Repealed.]

250.270.
Label guarantees; not to be used fraudulently. [Repealed.]

250.280.
Inspection fee. [Repealed.]

250.290.
Director to furnish stamps. [Repealed.]

250.300.
Manufacturer, seller or importer to file statement with director. [Repealed.]

250.310.
Registration of feeding stuff under misleading name or below standard may be refused. [Repealed.]

250.320.
Purchaser may have sample analyzed. [Repealed.]

250.330.
Director may analyze samples and publish results. [Repealed.]

250.340.
No action on sale on contract violating KRS 250.240 to 250.350. [Repealed.]

250.350.
Director may adopt standards and enforce regulations. [Repealed.]